Massachusetts, session 194th, H5012.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 102. Any public, private or charter school in the commonwealth, prekindergarten
to grade 12, inclusive, shall list on their website, in a centralized and easily accessible section,
comprehensive food and nutritional information for students who require medically restricted
diets, including students with celiac disease or food allergies. The website shall include, but not
be limited to, the following information:
(i) policies and procedures for safe food handling of gluten-free and allergen-free meals;
(ii) monthly gluten-free and allergen-free menus and nutritional information;
(iii) instructions for enrollment and access to these meals;
(iv) contact information for food service personnel; and
of 2

(v) contact information for disability and accessibility services.
SECTION 2. Chapter 73 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 21. Any public institution of higher education, established in section 5 of chapter
15A, or private institution of higher education in the commonwealth shall list on their website, in
a centralized and easily accessible section, comprehensive food and nutritional information for
students who require medically restricted diets, including students with celiac disease or food
allergies. The website shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:
(i) policies and procedures for safe food handling of gluten-free and allergen-free meals;
(ii) monthly gluten-free and allergen-free menus and nutritional information;
(iii) instructions for enrollment and access to these meals;
(iv) contact information for food service personnel; and
(v) contact information for disability and accessibility services.
of 2